Montana, session 2025, SB353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 50-12-104, MCA, is amended to read:
"50-12-104. Patient requirements. (1) A patient is eligible for treatment with an investigational drug,
biological product, or device if the patient has:
(1)(a) considered all other treatment options currently approved by the United States food and drug
administration;
(2)(b) received a recommendation from the patient's treating health care provider for an
investigational drug, biological product, or device;
(3)(c) given written informed consent for the use of the investigational drug, biological product, or
device; and
(4)(d) documentation from the treating health care provider that the patient meets the requirements of
this section.
(2) A minor is not eligible for treatment with an investigational drug, biological product, or device
unless the minor has a terminal illness that is attested to by the minor's treating health care provider."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 353